Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-139
Corporation; disciplinary action; grounds.

After notice and hearing as provided in sections 1-140 to 1-149, the board may take disciplinary action as provided in section 1-148 if the corporation, or any of its officers, employees, or agents, while acting for or on behalf of such corporation, is guilty of any act, neglect, or failure to act which would have been cause for such act as against an individual under section 1-137.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 34, p. 68;

Laws 1993, LB 41, § 5;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 33.